Utah statutes.
78B-6-702.   Definition -- Unreasonably dangerous.

As used in this part, "unreasonably dangerous" means that the product was dangerous to an extent beyond which would be contemplated by the ordinary and prudent buyer, consumer, or user of that product in that community considering the product's characteristics, propensities, risks, dangers, and uses together with any actual knowledge, training, or experience possessed by that particular buyer, user, or consumer.



Enacted by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

